Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon State University Extension Service and the College of Agri-
cultural Sciences of Oregon  State University shall conduct a statewide study to better un-
derstand the occurrence and distribution of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl  substances
(PFAS) found in biosolids applied to agricultural fields that do not produce crops intended for
human consumption.
(2) In conducting the study under this section, the extension  service and the college shall
collaborate with the Department of Environmental  Quality and Oregon wastewater service
providers to:
(a) Identify and  quantify PFAS concentrations in selected biosolids from wastewater
treatment facilities in this state;
(b) Identify and quantify PFAS concentrations  in the soil profiles of selected agricultural
fields that do not produce crops intended for  human consumption, on which biosolids ana-
lyzed in paragraph (a) of this subsection have been applied to land as  a soil amendment, and
in adjacent agricultural fields without a history of biosolid application;
(c) Utilizing the data collected under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, determine
the quantities of PFAS retained within and leached from soil profiles; and
(d) Identify and quantify PFAS concentrations in  crops not intended for human con-
sumption grown in agricultural fields analyzed under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3) Participation in the study by wastewater treatment service  providers, farmers, land
owners or land managers is voluntary.
(4) To the greatest extent possible, the  extension service and the college shall use data
collection methods that do not disclose the precise location of agricultural  fields or
wastewater treatment  facilities or identify the owners of agricultural fields or wastewater
treatment facilities that  are the subjects of the study. In the reports submitted under sub-
section (5) of  this section, the extension service and the college shall present summarized
information or aggregated data that does not directly identify  the location of agricultural
fields or wastewater  treatment facilities or identify the owners of agricultural fields or
wastewater treatment facilities.
(5) The extension service  and the college shall submit to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to agriculture, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245:
Enrolled House Bill 2947 (HB 2947-B) Page 1
(a) A  progress report on the study conducted under this section, no later than December
15, 2026; and
(b) A final report  on the study conducted under this section, no later than September 1,
2028. The final report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(A) PFAS concentrations in biosolids;
(B) PFAS concentrations in background and biosolid-amended soil horizons;
(C) PFAS concentrations in crops grown on biosolid-amended soils; and
(D) Comparisons to published literature for context and interpretation.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $410,000, for  distribution to Oregon State Uni-
versity to carry out the study under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2947 (HB 2947-B) Page 2